Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB14.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$355,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the rural hospital operations and facilities
revolving loan fund to provide targeted relief through competitive grants to rural
hospitals, allowing them to stabilize operations and modernize facilities.
Section 2. Whereas it is critical that funds are available to save rural hospitals
as soon as the funds are appropriated, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:10 AM Jacketed